California, session 20252026, SB1157.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 877 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:877. (a) Unless this section does not apply pursuant to subdivision (b), when determining whether to place a ward in a particular less restrictive program pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 875, if the program is one in which the ward resides in congregate residential care, the court shall consider all of the following information, which shall be submitted by program providers to the probation department for purposes of providing this information to the court:(1) Whether the program has current general liability insurance, professional liability insurance, and workers’ compensation insurance policies that satisfy any legal requirement to have insurance that is applicable to the program.(2) Whether the program has conducted criminal background checks on staff who have direct contact with wards or as otherwise required by law.(3) Whether the program has a plan for adhering to wards’ case plans and applicable accountability measures.(4) Whether the program has proof of notice submitted to the city and county in which it operates.(5) Whether the program has a rate structure.(b) This section does not apply to either of the following less restrictive programs:(1) A program operated by a juvenile facility subject to oversight and regulation by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) A program in the home of the ward’s parent or a supportive relative recognized by the county probation department and agreed to by the court.(c) After considering the information described in subdivision (a), the court shall state on the record the reason for placing a ward in a particular less restrictive program that is a program in which the ward resides in congregate residential care.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court’s discretion pursuant to Section 875.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.